Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
658A]

UNIFORM
ARBITRATION ACT

Section

658A-1 Definitions

658A-2 Notice

658A-3 When chapter applies

658A-4 Effect of agreement to arbitrate;
nonwaivable provisions

658A-5 Application for judicial relief

658A-6 Validity of agreement to arbitrate

658A-7 Motion to compel or stay arbitration

658A-8 Provisional remedies

658A-9 Initiation of arbitration

658A-10 Consolidation of separate arbitration
proceedings

658A-11 Appointment of arbitrator; service as a
neutral

arbitrator

658A-12 Disclosure by arbitrator

658A-13 Action by majority

658A-14 Immunity of arbitrator; competency to
testify;

attorney's fees and costs

658A-15 Arbitration process

658A-16 Representation by lawyer

658A-17 Witnesses; subpoenas; depositions;
discovery

658A-18 Judicial enforcement of pre-award ruling by
arbitrator

658A-19 Award

658A-20 Change of award by arbitrator

658A-21 Remedies; fees and expenses of arbitration
proceeding

658A-22 Confirmation of award

658A-23 Vacating award

658A-24 Modification or correction of award

658A-25 Judgment on award; attorney's fees and
litigation

expenses

658A-26 Jurisdiction

658A-27 Venue

658A-28 Appeals

658A-29 Relationship to Electric Signatures in
Global and

National Commerce Act

Case Notes

Where appellant was already bound by an arbitration agreement
executed on February 24, 2000, and therefore the post-July 1, 2002 arbitration
agreement was not a "new" arbitration agreement that would dictate
the application of this chapter to the arbitration proceedings, §658A-3(a) was
inapplicable to the case. 113 H. 127, 149 P.3d 495 (2006).

To the extent that there may be a conflict between the
jurisdictional provisions of this chapter and chapter 89, chapter 89 takes
precedence over this chapter. 132 H. 492 (App.), 323 P.3d 136 (2014).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next